Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2876
Delegated dispensing permit; disciplinary actions.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may deny an application for a delegated dispensing permit, revoke, limit, or suspend a delegated dispensing permit, or refuse renewal of a delegated dispensing permit for a violation of section 38-178 or 38-179 or for any violation of the Pharmacy Practice Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department, with the recommendation of the board, pursuant to the act.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 13;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 68;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 51;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.43;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 972.